Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.365

Accuracy, integrity, and privacy of records and information.

State agencies and local governments that collect and enter information concerning individuals into electronic records and information systems that will be widely accessible by the public under RCW 42.56.010 shall ensure the accuracy of this information to the extent possible. To the extent possible, information must be collected directly from, and with the consent of, the individual who is the subject of the data. State agencies shall establish procedures for correcting inaccurate information, including establishing mechanisms for individuals to review information about themselves and recommend changes in information they believe to be inaccurate. The inclusion of personal information in electronic public records that is widely available to the public should include information on the date when the database was created or most recently updated. If personally identifiable information is included in electronic public records that are made widely available to the public, state agencies must follow retention and archival schedules in accordance with chapter 40.14 RCW, retaining personally identifiable information only as long as needed to carry out the purpose for which it was collected. At least once every five years, each agency that collects information must review the information collected and justify why it is being collected and for what purpose.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 218; 2011 c 60 s 39; 1996 c 171 s 15. Formerly RCW 43.41A.140, 43.105.310.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

Captions not law—Effective dates—1996 c 171: See notes following RCW 2.68.050.